Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5670
Department; rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to the administration of the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 21.